New York, session 2025-2026, S10330.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 1 of part AA of chapter 58 of the 2 laws of 2016, relating to establishing a zero emissions vehicle and 3 clean burning fuel vehicle rebate program, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 3. The program created pursuant to this act shall include rebates for 6 eligible purchases[, provided that a rebate for an eligible purchase 7 shall not exceed two thousand dollars] as follows: 8 (a) Four thousand dollars for eligible vehicles with a United States 9 environmental protection agency estimated range rating of two hundred 10 miles or greater. 11 (b) Two thousand dollars for eligible vehicles with a United States 12 environmental protection agency estimated range rating between forty and 13 one hundred ninety-nine miles. 14 (c) One thousand dollars for eligible vehicles with a United States 15 environmental protection agency estimated range rating less than forty 16 miles. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 19 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 20 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 21 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14862-03-6